District of Columbia statutes.
42-1403

Proceeds of sale held by court and treated as real estate.

The proceeds of sale of said real estate shall be held under the control and subject to the order of the court, and shall be invested under its order and supervision upon real and personal security, and the same shall, to all intents and purposes, be deemed real estate and stand in the place of the real estate from the sale of which they are derived, and as such be subject to the limitations of the deed or will.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1205, ch. 854, § 99
1981 Ed., § 45-1003.
1973 Ed., § 45-1103.